Louisiana, session 2026, HB403.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 40:4.9(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
7 §4.9. Low-risk foods; preparation in home for public consumption
8 * * *
9 B. This Section shall does not apply to any preparer of low-risk foods made
10 at a home for sale, whose gross annual sales equal thirty thousand one hundred
11 thousand dollars or more.
12 * * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.